District of Columbia statutes.
33-111.01

Repealed

Law governing foreign limited liability partnership.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1101, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-161.1.